Hawaii statutes.
§441-16 Hearing. The notice of hearing
provided in section 441-15 shall be given by publication once a week for at
least three consecutive weeks in a daily newspaper of general circulation in
the county where the cemetery is located, and the posting of copies of the
notice in three conspicuous places on that portion of the property from which
the dedication is to be removed. The notice shall:

(1) Describe the portion of the cemetery property
sought to be removed from dedication;

(2) State that all remains have been removed or that
no interments have been made in the portion of the cemetery property sought to
be removed from dedication;

(3) Specify the time and place of the hearing. [L
1967, c 199, pt of §1; HRS §441-16]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next